Washington statutes.
RCW 39.98.050

Debt service payments—Notifications upon nonpayment—Payments by state treasurer—Repayment.

(1)(a) The county treasurer for each district with outstanding, unpaid bonds shall transfer money sufficient for each scheduled debt service payment to its paying agent on or before any principal or interest payment date for the bonds.

(b) A county treasurer who is unable to transfer a scheduled debt service payment to the paying agent on the transfer date shall immediately notify the paying agent and the state treasurer by:

(i) Telephone;

(ii) A writing sent by facsimile or electronic transmission; and

(iii) A writing sent by first-class United States mail.

(2) If sufficient funds are not transferred to the paying agent as required by subsection (1) of this section, the paying agent shall immediately notify the state treasurer of that failure by:

(a) Telephone;

(b) A writing sent by facsimile or electronic transmission; and

(c) A writing sent by first-class United States mail.

(3)(a) If sufficient money to pay the scheduled debt service payment have not been so transferred to the paying agent, the state treasurer shall, forthwith, transfer sufficient money to the paying agent to make the scheduled debt service payment.

(b) The payment by the state treasurer:

(i) Discharges the obligation of the issuing district to its bond owners for the payment, but does not retire any bond that has matured. The terms of that bond remain in effect until the state is repaid; and

(ii) Transfers the rights represented by the general obligation of the district from the bond owners to the state.

(c) The district shall repay to the state the money so transferred as provided in this chapter.

[ 1999 c 273 s 5.]